Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.095

Certification requirements—Trainees.

(1) The secretary shall issue a trainee certificate to any applicant who demonstrates to the satisfaction of the secretary that he or she is working toward the education and experience requirements in RCW 18.205.090.

(2) A trainee certified under this section shall submit to the secretary for approval a declaration, in accordance with rules adopted by the department, which shall be updated with the trainee's annual renewal, that he or she is actively pursuing the experience requirements under RCW 18.205.090 and is enrolled in:

(a) An approved education program; or

(b) An apprenticeship program reviewed by the substance use disorder certification advisory committee, approved by the secretary, and registered and approved under chapter 49.04 RCW.

(3) A trainee certified under this section may practice only under the supervision of a certified substance use disorder professional. The first 50 hours of any face-to-face client contact must be under direct observation. All remaining experience must be under supervision in accordance with rules adopted by the department.

(4) A certified substance use disorder professional trainee provides substance use disorder assessments, counseling, and case management and can provide clinical services to patients consistent with his or her education, training, and experience as approved by his or her supervisor.

(5) A person whose trainee certification was not renewed due to the person exceeding the four-renewal limit in place prior to June 6, 2024, shall be treated as if the person's certification expired. The secretary shall allow such a person to return the person's trainee certification to active status pursuant to standard rules and procedures in place for returning an expired credential to active status.

(6) Applicants are subject to denial of a certificate or issuance of a conditional certificate for the reasons set forth in chapter 18.130 RCW.

(7) A person certified under this chapter holding the title of chemical dependency professional trainee is considered to hold the title of substance use disorder professional trainee until such time as the person's present certification expires or is renewed.

[ 2024 c 371 s 13. Prior: 2021 c 165 s 1; 2021 c 57 s 1; 2019 c 444 s 6; 2008 c 135 s 18.]

NOTES:

Rule making—2024 c 371 ss 1-16: See note following RCW 18.83.020.

Rules—2021 c 165: "The department of health may adopt any rules necessary to implement this act." [ 2021 c 165 s 5.]

Effective date—2021 c 57: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [April 16, 2021]." [ 2021 c 57 s 3.]

Effective date—2008 c 135 ss 1, 2, 7-9, and 11-19: See note following RCW 18.19.020.